Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,234
Rotating or flashing lights; violation; penalty.

Any person who violates any provision of sections 60-6,230 to 60-6,233 shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor and shall also be ordered to remove from any vehicle or equipment any light found to be in violation of such sections.

Laws 1969, c. 327, § 6, p. 1172;

R.S.Supp.,1972, § 39-788.05;

Laws 1977, LB 41, § 23;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-6,152;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 330.